Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-651
Lottery ticket; requirements.

Each county, city, or village conducting a lottery shall have its name clearly associated with each ticket used in the lottery. No such ticket shall be sold unless such name is clearly identified.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 182;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 9-611;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 90;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 10.